Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-33] Hawaii Medical Center-East;
affiliation; acquisition. (a) Hawaii Medical Center-East on Oahu may be
assimilated into the corporation by negotiation between the corporation and the
owners of Hawaii Medical Center-East. Assimilation may be accomplished with
the creation of a new entity, a partnership, a long-term lease, or any other
vehicle determined to be in the best interests of the public by the corporation
board and as negotiated with the owners of Hawaii Medical Center-East. After
assimilation, Hawaii Medical Center-East shall be operated by the corporation,
either directly, through contractors, or through a subsidiary.

(b) None of the liabilities of Hawaii Medical
Center-East shall become liabilities of the corporation.

(c) Hawaii Medical Center-East, once
assimilated, shall be exempt from chapter 102 and section 103-53, and its board
of directors, if any, shall be exempt from part I of chapter 92.

(d) The purchase of goods and services by or
on behalf of Hawaii Medical Center-East, after assimilation, shall be exempt
from chapters 103D and 103F.

(e) Assimilation of Hawaii Medical Center-East
into the Hawaii health systems corporation shall be exempt from part VII of
chapter 323D.

(f) As used in this section, "Hawaii
Medical Center-East" means the facility previously known as Hawaii Medical
Center-East located on Liliha street on the island of Oahu. [L 2012, c 281, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next